Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4824.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [629.311] CIVIL ARREST RESTRICTIONS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Arrest" means a law enforcement agency or its officers taking an individual into custody. new text end new text begin (c) "Civil arrest" means an arrest that is not: new text end new text begin (1) a criminal arrest for an alleged criminal violation of any federal, state, or local law; new text end new text begin (2) for a violation of a condition of probation, parole, pretrial release, supervised release, or mandatory supervised release for which arrest is otherwise authorized by law; or new text end new text begin (3) supported by a judicial warrant or judicial order authorizing the arrest. new text end new text begin (d) "Court companion" means any of the following individuals whose purpose is to support, assist, or accompany a person who is going to, remaining at, or returning from a court proceeding: a spouse, domestic partner, or person who has a dating or engagement relationship with the party, witness, or potential witness; a biological parent, foster parent, adoptive parent, or stepparent of a party, witness, or potential witness; minor children or other persons under the care of a party, witness, or potential witness; an interpreter, translator, or other person assisting the party, witness, or potential witness with reading or completing court forms or other documents; persons providing health care or assistance to a party, witness, or potential witness to allow that individual to participate in the court proceeding; a case manager or social worker for the party, witness, or potential witness; a domestic violence or sexual assault advocate; or a person transporting a party, witness, or potential witness to or from the court proceeding. new text end new text begin (e) "Court proceeding" means the business conducted by a state court or a matter pending under the jurisdiction or supervision of a state court, including but not limited to civil proceedings and criminal proceedings. new text end new text begin (f) "Judicial warrant or judicial order authorizing the arrest" means a written order from a state court or federal Article III court that directs a law enforcement agency or some other person who is specifically named in the order to arrest a person. new text end new text begin (g) "Law enforcement agency" means a federal, state, or local governmental entity with statutory police powers and the authority to employ individuals authorized to make arrests. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Restrictions. new text end new text begin (a) A person duly and in good faith attending a state court proceeding in which the person is a party, witness, potential witness, or court companion of a party, witness, or potential witness is privileged from civil arrest while going to, remaining at, and returning from the court proceeding, including: new text end new text begin (1) at the place of the court proceedings; new text end new text begin (2) within the courthouse building; new text end new text begin (3) on the premises of the courthouse, including parking facilities serving the courthouse; new text end new text begin (4) on any sidewalk, parkway, or street surrounding the courthouse and its premises; and new text end new text begin (5) on any public way within 1,000 feet of the courthouse, including a sidewalk, parkway, or street. new text end new text begin (b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to narrow, or in any way lessen, any common law or other right or privilege of a person privileged from arrest under this section or otherwise. new text end new text begin (c) The protections in this section apply regardless of whether a judicial order under subdivision 3 is issued or a court otherwise implements this section by a rule or order. new text end new text begin (d) Nothing in this section precludes the execution of a criminal arrest warrant issued by a judge or a criminal arrest based on probable cause for a violation of criminal law. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Court order. new text end new text begin In order to maintain access to the court and open judicial proceedings for all persons in their individual capacity and to prevent interference with the needs of judicial administration, a court may issue appropriate judicial orders to protect the privilege from arrest under this section or common law. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Civil action; enforcement; remedies. new text end new text begin (a) A person who violates this section is liable for civil damages for false imprisonment, including actual damages and statutory damages of $10,000, if that person knew or reasonably should have known that the person arrested is a person duly and in good faith attending, going to, or returning from a state court proceeding in which the person is a party, witness, potential witness, or court companion of a party, witness, or potential witness. new text end new text begin (b) A court may grant any other equitable or declaratory relief it deems appropriate and just. new text end new text begin (c) In any successful action under this subdivision, a plaintiff or petitioner may recover costs and reasonable attorney fees. new text end new text begin (d) No action or proceeding may be commenced under this section against the state court system or any state court system personnel acting lawfully under their duty to maintain safety and order in the courts. new text end new text begin (e) Nothing in this section affects any right or defense, including any existing qualified immunity defense, of any person, police officer, peace officer, or public officer or any state court system personnel acting lawfully. new text end